District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1964

Eligibility requirements for appointment and promotion; definitions.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 524, ch. 569, title II, § 3
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 362, Pub. L. 91-297, title III, § 302(3)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 11, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1111.
1973 Ed., § 31-1512.